Arkansas, session 2025, HB1640.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-24-102(1), concerning the definition of
"administrator" as it relates to ethical guidelines and prohibitions, is
amended to read as follows:
(1) “Administrator” means any a superintendent or assistant
superintendent or his or her equivalent, school district treasurer, business
manager, principal, assistant principal, curriculum director, or other
individual directly responsible for entity-wide purchasing;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-24-102(16), concerning the definition of
"public educational entity" as it relates to ethical guidelines and
*TNL041*
03-04-2025 09:53:04 TNL041

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1640
prohibitions, is amended to read as follows:
(16)(A) “Public educational entity” means Arkansas public school
districts, public schools, charter schools, education service cooperatives,
or any publicly supported entity having supervision over public educational
entities.
(B) “Public educational entity” does not include
institutions of higher education.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-24-111(a)(1), concerning restrictions on
employment of an administrator, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Unless written approval is granted by the public school
district board of directors currently employing an administrator and the
Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education, it is a breach of the
ethical standards of this chapter for administrators to be or become the
employee, agent, or independent contractor of any party contracting with the
public educational entity the administrators serve.

/s/Duke


















03-04-2025 09:53:04 TNL041